Hawaii statutes.
§142-42 Expiration of registration,
reregistration. Each brand registered under section 142-41 shall expire on
December 31, 1960, and at each five year interval thereafter unless
reregistered during the one hundred twenty days preceding date of expiration.
[L 1893-4, c 57, §1; RL 1925, §682; RL 1935, §260; RL 1945, §1069; am L 1955, c
73, §1(b); RL 1955, §20-41; HRS §142-42]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next